Washington statutes.
RCW 43.06.120

Federal funds and programs—Acceptance of funds by governor authorized—Administration and disbursement.

The governor is authorized to accept on behalf of the state of Washington funds provided by any act of congress for the benefit of the state or its political subdivisions. He or she is further authorized to administer and disburse such funds, or to designate an agency to administer and disburse them, until the legislature otherwise directs.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5021; 1967 ex.s. c 41 s 1.]